Utah statutes.
62A-4a-403.   Reporting requirements.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), when any person including
persons licensed under Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, or
Title 58, Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act, has reason to believe that a child
has been subjected to abuse or neglect, or who observes a child being
subjected to conditions or circumstances which would reasonably result in
abuse or neglect, that person shall immediately notify the nearest peace
officer, law enforcement agency, or office of the division.
(b)  Upon receipt of the notification described in Subsection (1)(a), the
peace officer or law enforcement agency shall immediately notify the nearest
office of the division.  If an initial report of abuse or neglect is made to
the division, the division shall immediately notify the appropriate local law
enforcement agency.  The division shall, in addition to its own investigation,
comply with and lend support to investigations by law enforcement undertaken
pursuant to a report made under this section.
(2)  Subject to Subsection (3), the notification requirements of Subsection
(1) do not apply to a clergyman or priest, without the consent of the person
making the confession, with regard to any confession made to the clergyman or
priest in the professional character of the clergyman or priest in the course
of discipline enjoined by the church to which the clergyman or priest belongs,
if:
(a)  the confession was made directly to the clergyman or priest by the
perpetrator; and
(b)  the clergyman or priest is, under canon law or church doctrine or
practice, bound to maintain the confidentiality of that confession.
(3) (a)  When a clergyman or priest receives information about abuse or
neglect from any source other than confession of the perpetrator, the
clergyman or priest is required to give notification on the basis of that
information even though the clergyman or priest may have also received a
report of abuse or neglect from the confession of the perpetrator.
(b)  Exemption of notification requirements for a clergyman or priest does not
exempt a clergyman or priest from any other efforts required by law to prevent
further abuse or neglect by the perpetrator.
